District of Columbia statutes.
29A-929

Repealed

Liability of members.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 486, ch. 397, § 29
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-829.
1981 Ed., § 29-1129.
2001 Ed., § 29-929.